Utah statutes.
63C-7-102.   Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish an independent state agency and a board and executive committee to administer the creation, administration, and maintenance of the Utah Communications Agency Network to provide public safety communications services and facilities on a regional or statewide basis for the benefit and use of public agencies and state and federal agencies.



Enacted by Chapter 136, 1997 General Session

